Atelier/dicollect/fr-dicollecte-daily-classique-reforme1990-v2012-12-27.aff
FLAG long
SFX iP N 51
SFX iP ourir ourir mourir is:infi
SFX iP ourir ourant mourir is:ppre
SFX iP ourir ort mourir is:ppas is:mas
SFX iP ourir orts mourir is:ppas is:mas is:pl
SFX iP ourir orte mourir is:ppas is:fem
SFX iP ourir ortes mourir is:ppas is:fem is:pl
SFX iP ourir eurs mourir is:ipre is:1sg
SFX iP ourir eurs mourir is:ipre is:2sg
SFX iP ourir eurt mourir is:ipre is:3sg
SFX iP ourir ourons mourir is:ipre is:1pl
SFX iP ourir ourez mourir is:ipre is:2pl
SFX iP ourir eurent mourir is:ipre is:3pl
SFX iP ourir ourais mourir is:iimp is:1sg
SFX iP ourir ourais mourir is:iimp is:2sg
SFX iP ourir ourait mourir is:iimp is:3sg
SFX iP ourir ourions mourir is:iimp is:1pl
SFX iP ourir ouriez mourir is:iimp is:2pl
SFX iP ourir ouraient mourir is:iimp is:3pl
SFX iP ourir ourus mourir is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX iP ourir ourus mourir is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX iP ourir ourut mourir is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX iP ourir ourûmes mourir is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX iP ourir ourûtes mourir is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX iP ourir oururent mourir is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX iP ourir ourrai mourir is:ifut is:1sg
SFX iP ourir ourras mourir is:ifut is:2sg
SFX iP ourir ourra mourir is:ifut is:3sg
SFX iP ourir ourrons mourir is:ifut is:1pl
SFX iP ourir ourrez mourir is:ifut is:2pl
SFX iP ourir ourront mourir is:ifut is:3pl
SFX iP ourir ourrais mourir is:cond is:1sg
SFX iP ourir ourrais mourir is:cond is:2sg
SFX iP ourir ourrait mourir is:cond is:3sg
SFX iP ourir ourrions mourir is:cond is:1pl
SFX iP ourir ourriez mourir is:cond is:2pl
SFX iP ourir ourraient mourir is:cond is:3pl
SFX iP ourir eure mourir is:spre is:1sg
SFX iP ourir eures mourir is:spre is:2sg
SFX iP ourir eure mourir is:spre is:3sg
SFX iP ourir ourions mourir is:spre is:1pl
SFX iP ourir ouriez mourir is:spre is:2pl
SFX iP ourir eurent mourir is:spre is:3pl
SFX iP ourir ourusse mourir is:simp is:1sg
SFX iP ourir ourusses mourir is:simp is:2sg
SFX iP ourir ourût mourir is:simp is:3sg
SFX iP ourir ourussions mourir is:simp is:1pl
SFX iP ourir ourussiez mourir is:simp is:2pl
SFX iP ourir ourussent mourir is:simp is:3pl
SFX iP ourir eurs mourir is:impe is:2sg
SFX iP ourir ourons mourir is:impe is:1pl
SFX iP ourir ourez mourir is:impe is:2pl
SFX iQ N 51
SFX iQ ouillir ouillir bouillir is:infi
SFX iQ ouillir ouillant bouillir is:ppre
SFX iQ ouillir ouilli bouillir is:ppas is:mas
SFX iQ ouillir ouillis bouillir is:ppas is:mas is:pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillie bouillir is:ppas is:fem
SFX iQ ouillir ouillies bouillir is:ppas is:fem is:pl
SFX iQ ouillir ous bouillir is:ipre is:1sg
SFX iQ ouillir ous bouillir is:ipre is:2sg
SFX iQ ouillir out bouillir is:ipre is:3sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillons bouillir is:ipre is:1pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillez bouillir is:ipre is:2pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillent bouillir is:ipre is:3pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillais bouillir is:iimp is:1sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillais bouillir is:iimp is:2sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillait bouillir is:iimp is:3sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillions bouillir is:iimp is:1pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouilliez bouillir is:iimp is:2pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillaient bouillir is:iimp is:3pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillis bouillir is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillis bouillir is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillit bouillir is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillîmes bouillir is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillîtes bouillir is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirent bouillir is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirai bouillir is:ifut is:1sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouilliras bouillir is:ifut is:2sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillira bouillir is:ifut is:3sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirons bouillir is:ifut is:1pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirez bouillir is:ifut is:2pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouilliront bouillir is:ifut is:3pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirais bouillir is:cond is:1sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirais bouillir is:cond is:2sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirait bouillir is:cond is:3sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirions bouillir is:cond is:1pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouilliriez bouillir is:cond is:2pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouilliraient bouillir is:cond is:3pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouille bouillir is:spre is:1sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouilles bouillir is:spre is:2sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouille bouillir is:spre is:3sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillions bouillir is:spre is:1pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouilliez bouillir is:spre is:2pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillent bouillir is:spre is:3pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillisse bouillir is:simp is:1sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillisses bouillir is:simp is:2sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillît bouillir is:simp is:3sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillissions bouillir is:simp is:1pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillissiez bouillir is:simp is:2pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillissent bouillir is:simp is:3pl
SFX iQ ouillir ous bouillir is:impe is:2sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillons bouillir is:impe is:1pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillez bouillir is:impe is:2pl
SFX iR Y 51
SFX iR ueillir ueillir/n'q'd'l'm't's' cueillir is:infi
SFX iR ueillir ueillant/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir is:ppre
SFX iR ueillir ueilli/q' cueillir is:ppas is:mas
SFX iR ueillir ueillis/q' cueillir is:ppas is:mas is:pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillie/q' cueillir is:ppas is:fem
SFX iR ueillir ueillies/q' cueillir is:ppas is:fem is:pl
SFX iR ueillir ueille/n'q'j'l't' cueillir is:ipre is:1sg
SFX iR ueillir ueilles/n'q'l'm' cueillir is:ipre is:2sg
SFX iR ueillir ueille/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir is:ipre is:3sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillons/n'q'l't' cueillir is:ipre is:1pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillez/n'q'l'm' cueillir is:ipre is:2pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillent/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir is:ipre is:3pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillais/n'q'j'l't' cueillir is:iimp is:1sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillais/n'q'l'm' cueillir is:iimp is:2sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillait/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir is:iimp is:3sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillions/n'q'l't' cueillir is:iimp is:1pl
SFX iR ueillir ueilliez/n'q'l'm' cueillir is:iimp is:2pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillaient/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir is:iimp is:3pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillis/n'q'j'l't' cueillir is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillis/n'q'l'm' cueillir is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillit/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillîmes/n'q'l't' cueillir is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillîtes/n'q'l'm' cueillir is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillirent/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillerai/n'q'j'l't' cueillir is:ifut is:1sg
SFX iR ueillir ueilleras/n'q'l'm' cueillir is:ifut is:2sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillera/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir is:ifut is:3sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillerons/n'q'l't' cueillir is:ifut is:1pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillerez/n'q'l'm' cueillir is:ifut is:2pl
SFX iR ueillir ueilleront/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir is:ifut is:3pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillerais/n'q'j'l't' cueillir is:cond is:1sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillerais/n'q'l'm' cueillir is:cond is:2sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillerait/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir is:cond is:3sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillerions/n'q'l't' cueillir is:cond is:1pl
SFX iR ueillir ueilleriez/n'q'l'm' cueillir is:cond is:2pl
SFX iR ueillir ueilleraient/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir is:cond is:3pl
SFX iR ueillir ueille/n'j'l't' cueillir is:spre is:1sg
SFX iR ueillir ueilles/n'l'm' cueillir is:spre is:2sg
SFX iR ueillir ueille/n'l'm't's' cueillir is:spre is:3sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillions/n'l't' cueillir is:spre is:1pl
SFX iR ueillir ueilliez/n'l'm' cueillir is:spre is:2pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillent/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir is:spre is:3pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillisse/n'q'j'l't' cueillir is:simp is:1sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillisses/n'q'l'm' cueillir is:simp is:2sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillît/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir is:simp is:3sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillissions/n'q'l't' cueillir is:simp is:1pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillissiez/n'q'l'm' cueillir is:simp is:2pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillissent/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir is:simp is:3pl
SFX iR ueillir ueille/n'l'm' cueillir is:impe is:2sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillons/n'l' cueillir is:impe is:1pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillez/n'l'm' cueillir is:impe is:2pl
