Atelier/dicollect/fr-dicollecte-daily-classique-reforme1990-v2012-12-27.dic
accueillir/iR() po:v3t
bouillir/iQ() po:v3it
cueillir/iR() po:v3t
débouillir/iQ() po:v3t
mourir/iP() po:v3ip
recueillir/iR() po:v3tp
